test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kaeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kǟʼdõ: # Verb 5 'eng /est käia/fin' - full paradigm
     kǟʼdõ+V+Inf: kǟʼdõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ger: kǟʼdsõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ger: kǟʼdsõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup: kǟʼmõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ine: kǟʼmõõs
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Ela: kǟʼmõõst
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Tra: kǟʼmõõks
     kǟʼdõ+V+Sup+Abe: kǟʼmõõt
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kǟʼb
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kǟʼtõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kǟʼbõd
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keʼi
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: keʼitõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: keʼitõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kǟʼ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kǟʼks
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kǟʼ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kǟʼ
     kǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kǟʼgid
     kǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kǟʼgõ
     kǟʼdõ+V+QuoSg3: kēʼji
     kǟʼdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kǟʼnd
     kǟʼdõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kǟʼdõd
